Tennessee, session 114, SB1438.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Chapter 234 of the Private Acts of 1972, as amended by Chapter 121 of
the Private Acts of 1975, Chapter 96 of the Private Acts of 1983, Chapter 8 of the Private Acts
of 1985, Chapter 47 of the Private Acts of 2005, and any other acts amendatory thereto, is
amended by deleting the chapter, as amended, and substituting:
Section 1. Chester County hereby levies a motor vehicle privilege tax in the
amount of sixty-five dollars and thirty-five cents ($65.35) per motor vehicle per year for
each motor vehicle, the owner of which resides in Chester County, except that this tax
shall not be levied on vehicles held by auto-dealers for resale or on farm tractors. This
motor vehicle privilege tax is levied as a condition precedent for the operation of a motor
vehicle within Chester County.
Section 2. The County Clerk of Chester County shall collect the tax levied
herein.
Section 3. Payment of the tax levied herein shall be evidenced by a receipt
issued by the County Clerk, a copy of which must be kept by the owner of the vehicle
and by a decal displayed on the license plate of the vehicle.
Section 4. Pursuant to Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 5, Chapter 8, Part 1
and Title 55, Chapter 4, Part 1, a violation of this Act is a Class C misdemeanor.
SB1438
002164
- 1 -

SECTION 2. This act shall have no effect unless it is approved by a two-thirds (2/3) vote
of the legislative body of Chester County. Its approval or nonapproval shall be proclaimed by
the presiding officer of the legislative body and certified to the secretary of state.
SECTION 3. For the purpose of approving or rejecting the provisions of this act, it shall
be effective upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it. For all other purposes, it shall
become effective as provided in Section 6.
- 2 - 002164